Arkansas, session 2025, HB1031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Healthy
Lifestyle Education Act of 2025".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) According to a 2023 report by the United Health Foundation,
Arkansas ranks number forty-eight (48) in the nation for overall health;
(2) Based on the 2018 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
High School Youth Risk Behavior Survey, Arkansas ranked highest in the nation
for the percentage of students who:
(A) Have considered suicide;
*TNL006*
01-16-2025 14:55:09 TNL006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1031
(B) Are considered obese;
(C) Have been forced to have sex; or
(D) Use smokeless tobacco;
(3) According to data reported in 2022 by the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention, Arkansas has the second highest teen birth
rate in the nation; and
(4) As a result of Arkansas's rankings in these nationwide
findings, it is imperative that the General Assembly ensure that certain
topics are addressed in the student health curriculum in our secondary public
schools.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 10, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-16-1008. Health curriculum requirements.
(a) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, each public school shall
offer a health course with a curriculum that provides evidence-based
instruction to each student in grades seven through twelve (7-12) on:
(1)(A) Mental health issues.
(B) The mental health curriculum required under this
subdivision (a)(1) shall include without limitation:
(i) Suicide prevention methods; and
(ii) Information regarding recognition of mental
health crises;
(2)(A) Substance abuse and addiction issues.
(B) The substance abuse and addiction curriculum required
under this section shall include without limitation:
(i) Information regarding prescription drug abuse,
illicit drug abuse, alcohol abuse, and other substances known to be abused
during adolescence; and
(ii) Substance abuse, consequences of substance
abuse, and prevention methods;
(3)(A) Diet and obesity issues.
(B) The diet and obesity curriculum required under this
subdivision (a)(3) shall include information aimed at preventing physical
health issues, including without limitation:
(i) Obesity;
01-16-2025 14:55:09 TNL006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1031
(ii) Cardiovascular disease; and
(iii) Type 2 diabetes;
(4)(A) Tobacco use prevention and cessation.
(B) The tobacco use prevention and cessation curriculum
required under this section shall include without limitation information
regarding:
(i) Adverse health effects of using any form of
tobacco or nicotine delivery system;
(ii) E-cigarettes and vaping;
(iii) Addiction; and
(iv) Cessation; and
(5)(A) Teenage pregnancy prevention.
(B) The teenage pregnancy prevention curriculum required
under this subdivision (a)(5) shall include without limitation information
regarding:
(i) The prevention of unintended pregnancy and the
prevention of sexually transmitted infections through abstinence and
contraception; and
(ii) The topic of consent and healthy relationships.
(C) A parent or legal guardian may submit a written
request for his or her child to be excused from all or any part of the health
curriculum regarding teenage pregnancy prevention under this subdivision
(a)(5).
(b) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall:
(1) Identify and develop, in consultation with the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences and the Department of Health, evidence-based
health resources required under this section; and
(2) Provide professional development support regarding academic
health standards and evidence-based resources for teachers who are
responsible for implementing the health curriculum required under this
section.

/s/D.Garner



01-16-2025 14:55:09 TNL006